North Dakota statutes. TITLE 50 Public Welfare
CHAPTER 50-11 Foster Care Homes for Children and Adults

50-11-00.1.
Definitions. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

As used in this chapter:

“Agency foster home for adults” means a residential home in which foster care for adults is regularly provided by professional staff trained to provide services to older adults or adults with a disability, to four or fewer adults who are not related by blood or marriage to the owner or lessee, for hire or compensation.

“Approval” means the approval by the department, upon submission of tribal licensing standards or in the absence of tribal licensing standards compliance with state standards, of a facility located on or near, as identified by the tribe, a recognized Indian reservation in North Dakota, not subject to the jurisdiction of the state of North Dakota for licensing purposes, to allow the facility to receive title IV-E funding.

“Authorized agent” means the human service zone, unless another entity is designated by the department.

“Department” means the department of human services.

“Facility” means a foster home for adults, agency foster home for adults, family foster home for children, supervised independent living program, or qualified residential treatment program for children.

“Family foster home for children” means an occupied private residence in which foster care for children is regularly provided by the owner or lessee of the residence to no more than six children, unless the department approves otherwise.

“Foster care for adults” means the provision of food, shelter, security and safety, guidance, and comfort on a twenty-four-hour per day basis, in the residential home of a caregiver or agency, to an individual age eighteen or older, who is unable, neglects, or refuses to provide for the individual’s own care.

“Foster care for children” means the provision of substitute parental child care for those children who are in need of care for which the child’s parent, guardian, or custodian is unable, neglects, or refuses to provide, and includes the provision of food, shelter, security and safety, guidance, and comfort on a twenty-four-hour basis, to one or more children under twenty-one years of age to safeguard the child’s growth and development and to minimize and counteract hazards to the child’s emotional health inherent in the separation from the child’s family. Foster care may be provided in a licensed or approved family foster home for children, supervised independent living program, or qualified residential treatment program.

“Foster home for adults” means an occupied private residence in which foster care for adults is regularly provided by the owner or lessee of the residence, to four or fewer adults who are not related by blood or marriage to the owner or lessee, for hire or compensation.

“Identified relative” means:

The child’s grandparent, great grandparent, sibling, half sibling, aunt, great aunt, uncle, great uncle, nephew, niece, or first cousin;

An individual with a relationship to the child, derived through a current or former spouse of the child's parent, similar to a relationship described in subdivision a;

An individual recognized in the child's community as having a relationship with the child similar to a relationship described in subdivision a; or

The child's stepparent.

“Qualified residential treatment program” means a licensed or approved residence providing an out-of-home treatment placement for children.

“Supervised independent living program” means a licensed or approved setting providing supervision and service delivery to youth transitioning into adulthood.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 453, § 1; 1987, ch. 571, § 8; 1993, ch. 472, § 2; 2005, ch. 418, § 2; 2009, ch. 267, § 4; 2011, ch. 357, § 1; 2015, ch. 338, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 224, § 3, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 391, § 109, effective January 1, 2020; 2019, ch. 404, § 5, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 404, § 6, effective October 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 405, § 2, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 352, § 417, effective September 1, 2022; 2021, ch. 355, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by
section 1 of chapter 339, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2011 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 357, S.L. 2011 became effective August 1, 2011.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 4 of chapter 267, S.L. 2009 became effective August 1, 2009.

Note.

Section 50-11-00.1 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made inSection 2 of Chapter 355, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1091;and Section 417 of Chapter 352, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1247.

Section 50-11-01 was amended 4 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 109 of Chapter 391, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2124; Section 5 of Chapter 404, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1102; Section 6 of Chapter 404, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1102; and Section 2 of Chapter 405, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1099.

Section 8 of chapter 405, S.L. 2019 provides, “

CONTINGENT IMPLEMENTATION - APPLICATION.

The department of human services may not implement residential habilitation and community supports in section 6 of this Act unless the sixty-sixth legislative assembly provides an appropriation in Senate Bill No. 2012 to support the implementation of residential habilitation and community supports in section 6 of this Act.”

50-11-00.1.
Definitions. [Effective September 1, 2022]

As used in this chapter:

“Agency foster home for adults” means a residential home in which foster care for adults is regularly provided by professional staff trained to provide services to older adults or adults with a disability, to four or fewer adults who are not related by blood or marriage to the owner or lessee, for hire or compensation.

“Approval” means the approval by the department, upon submission of tribal licensing standards or in the absence of tribal licensing standards compliance with state standards, of a facility located on or near, as identified by the tribe, a recognized Indian reservation in North Dakota, not subject to the jurisdiction of the state of North Dakota for licensing purposes, to allow the facility to receive title IV-E funding.

“Authorized agent” means the human service zone, unless another entity is designated by the department.

“Department” means the department of health and human services.

“Facility” means a foster home for adults, agency foster home for adults, family foster home for children, supervised independent living program, or qualified residential treatment program for children.

“Family foster home for children” means an occupied private residence in which foster care for children is regularly provided by the owner or lessee of the residence to no more than six children, unless the department approves otherwise.

“Foster care for adults” means the provision of food, shelter, security and safety, guidance, and comfort on a twenty-four-hour per day basis, in the residential home of a caregiver or agency, to an individual age eighteen or older, who is unable, neglects, or refuses to provide for the individual’s own care.

“Foster care for children” means the provision of substitute parental child care for those children who are in need of care for which the child’s parent, guardian, or custodian is unable, neglects, or refuses to provide, and includes the provision of food, shelter, security and safety, guidance, and comfort on a twenty-four-hour basis, to one or more children under twenty-one years of age to safeguard the child’s growth and development and to minimize and counteract hazards to the child’s emotional health inherent in the separation from the child’s family. Foster care may be provided in a licensed or approved family foster home for children, supervised independent living program, or qualified residential treatment program.

“Foster home for adults” means an occupied private residence in which foster care for adults is regularly provided by the owner or lessee of the residence, to four or fewer adults who are not related by blood or marriage to the owner or lessee, for hire or compensation.

“Identified relative” means:

The child’s grandparent, great grandparent, sibling, half sibling, aunt, great aunt, uncle, great uncle, nephew, niece, or first cousin;

An individual with a relationship to the child, derived through a current or former spouse of the child's parent, similar to a relationship described in subdivision a;

An individual recognized in the child's community as having a relationship with the child similar to a relationship described in subdivision a; or

The child's stepparent.

“Qualified residential treatment program” means a licensed or approved residence providing an out-of-home treatment placement for children.

“Supervised independent living program” means a licensed or approved setting providing supervision and service delivery to youth transitioning into adulthood.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 453, § 1; 1987, ch. 571, § 8; 1993, ch. 472, § 2; 2005, ch. 418, § 2; 2009, ch. 267, § 4; 2011, ch. 357, § 1; 2015, ch. 338, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 224, § 3, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 391, § 109, effective January 1, 2020; 2019, ch. 404, § 5, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 404, § 6, effective October 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 405, § 2, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 352, § 417, effective September 1, 2022; 2021, ch. 355, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.

50-11-01.
Foster care for children — License or approval required.

A person may not furnish foster care for children for more than thirty days during a calendar year without first procuring a license or approval to do so from the department. The mandatory provisions of this section requiring licensure or approval do not apply when the care is provided in:

The home of an identified relative.

A home or institution under the management and control of the state or a political subdivision.

A home or facility furnishing room and board primarily to accommodate the child’s educational or career and technical education needs.

An individual providing care under subdivision a of subsection 1 shall submit to a criminal history record investigation as required under section 50-11-06.8.

Source:

S.L. 1915, ch. 183, § 6; 1923, ch. 161, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 5099b1; S.L. 1939, ch. 193, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 50-1101; S.L. 1969, ch. 419, § 1; 1975, ch. 444, § 14; 1977, ch. 453, § 2; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1993, ch. 472, § 3; 2003, ch. 138, § 88; 2007, ch. 115, § 13; 2019, ch. 404, § 7, effective October 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 13 of chapter 115, S.L. 2007 became effective May 1, 2007, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 23 of chapter 115, S.L. 2007.

Cross-References.

Interstate Compact on Placement of Children, see § 14-13-05.

50-11-01.1.
Family day care home for children defined. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 444, § 17.

Note.

For present provisions, see § 50-11.1-02.

50-11-01.2.
Day care center for children defined. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 444, § 17.

Note.

For present provisions, see § 50-11.1-02.

50-11-01.3.
Use of public funds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 472, § 25.

50-11-01.4.
Foster care for adults — License required.

A person may not furnish foster care for adults for more than one adult, or for more than two adults who are related to each other, without first procuring a license to do so from the department. A person may not furnish foster care for an adult if the person has had a license denied or revoked unless the department subsequently issues a license to that person.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 472, § 4; 2011, ch. 358, § 1.

Effective Date.

The 2011 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 358, S.L. 2011 became effective April 25, 2011, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 3 of chapter 358, S.L. 2011.

50-11-01.5.
Fire prevention training. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

Before initial licensure and each renewal under this chapter, each foster parent shall complete a course of instruction related to fire prevention and safety. The state fire marshal shall design the course in cooperation with the department of human services. The course must be available on videotape or any equivalent medium as designed by the department. The department of human services shall offer the course throughout the state.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 479, § 1.

50-11-01.5.
Fire prevention training. [Effective September 1, 2022]

Before initial licensure and each renewal under this chapter, each foster parent shall complete a course of instruction related to fire prevention and safety. The state fire marshal shall design the course in cooperation with the department of health and human services. The course must be available on videotape or any equivalent medium as designed by the department. The department of health and human services shall offer the course throughout the state.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 479, § 1; 2021, ch. 352, § 418, effective September 1, 2022.

50-11-01.6.
Self-declaration form. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The department of human services shall prescribe self-declaration forms to be completed and signed by each foster parent before initial licensure and each renewal under this chapter. The self-declaration forms must include references to smoke detectors, fire extinguishers, fire escape plans, and inspections of appliances, electrical systems, and heating systems.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 479, § 2.

50-11-01.6.
Self-declaration form. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services shall prescribe self-declaration forms to be completed and signed by each foster parent before initial licensure and each renewal under this chapter. The self-declaration forms must include references to smoke detectors, fire extinguishers, fire escape plans, and inspections of appliances, electrical systems, and heating systems.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 479, § 2; 2021, ch. 352, § 419, effective September 1, 2022.

50-11-02.
License granted — Term — Conditions.

The department shall grant a license for the operation of a facility receiving persons for foster care, for a period of not more than two years, to reputable and responsible persons upon showing that:

The premises to be used are in fit sanitary condition and properly equipped to provide good care for all persons who may be received;

The persons in active charge of the facility are properly qualified to carry on efficiently the duties required of them;

The facility is likely to be conducted for the public good in accordance with sound social policy and with due regard to the health, morality, and well-being of all persons cared for in the facility;

The facility will be maintained according to the standards prescribed for its conduct by the rules of the department;

The applicant has not had a previous facility license denied within two years of the date of the current application, unless waived by the department after the department considers the health and safety of children and the licensing history of the applicant; and

The applicant has not had a previous facility license revoked within five years of the date of the current application, unless waived by the department after the department considers the health and safety of children and the licensing history of the applicant.

Before licensing or approving a facility providing foster care for children or adults, the department shall seek a criminal history record when required by this chapter. The department shall consider any criminal history record information available at the time a licensing or approval decision is made.

The department shall determine, in accordance with rules of the department, whether a license may be issued to a facility that houses or employs any individual who has a criminal record.

Source:

S.L. 1915, ch. 183, §§ 6, 13; 1923, ch. 161, § 2; 1925 Supp., § 5099b2; R.C. 1943, § 50-1102; S.L. 1969, ch. 419, § 2; 1975, ch. 444, § 16; 1993, ch. 472, § 5; 1995, ch. 304, § 2; 1997, ch. 408, § 1; 2001, ch. 423, § 1; 2021, ch. 355, § 3, effective August 1, 2021.

50-11-02.1.
Conviction not bar to licensure — Exceptions.

Conviction of an offense does not disqualify a person from licensure under this chapter unless the department determines that the offense has a direct bearing upon that person’s ability to serve the public as the operator of a facility or that, following conviction of any offense, the person is not sufficiently rehabilitated under section 12.1-33-02.1.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 130, § 62; 1993, ch. 472, § 6.

50-11-02.2.
Provisional license.

At the discretion of the department, a provisional license may be issued to an applicant who, or whose facility, fails to conform in all respects to this chapter and the rules of the department. The department may set conditions under which a provisional license may be issued, and may issue such a license for any period of time, not to exceed two years, as the department may deem reasonable or appropriate to the circumstances of the case. The department may not be compelled to issue a provisional license.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 472, § 7.

Cross-References.

Definition of offense, see

§ 12.1-01-04.

50-11-02.3.
Maximum qualified residential treatment program bed capacity.

Notwithstanding sections 50-11-02 and 50-11-09, the department shall determine the maximum number of licensed qualified residential treatment program bed capacity for children based upon a needs assessment conducted by the department.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 34, § 11; 2001, ch. 255, § 2; 2003, ch. 229, § 2; 2005, ch. 409, § 3; 2007, ch. 257, § 2; 2019, ch. 404, § 8, effective October 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 257, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

50-11-02.4.
Criminal history record investigation for foster care for adults — Fingerprinting not required.

Except as provided in section 50-11-06.9, the department shall secure from any individual employed by, or providing care in, a facility providing foster care for adults and any adult living in the facility, but not being provided care in the facility, identifying information other than fingerprints, that is appropriate to accomplish a statewide criminal history record investigation.

Fingerprints need not be taken and a nationwide background check need not be made if an individual:

Has resided continuously in this state for eleven years or since reaching age eighteen, whichever is less;

Is on active United States military duty or has resided continuously in this state since receiving an honorable discharge; or

Is excused from providing fingerprints under rules adopted by the department.

The department shall verify that sufficient identifying information has been provided. Upon verification, the department shall submit that information to the bureau of criminal investigation.

The bureau of criminal investigation shall provide any criminal history record information that may lawfully be made available under chapter 12-60 to the department. The department shall provide a copy of any response received from the bureau of criminal investigation to the facility.

The department shall pay the cost of securing any criminal history record information made available under chapter 12-60 and section 50-11-06.8 for foster home for adults. An agency foster home for adults is responsible for the cost of securing any criminal history record information made available under chapter 12-60 and section 50-11-06.8.

The department shall consult with the bureau of criminal investigation to determine the identifying information, other than fingerprints, appropriate to accomplish a statewide criminal history record investigation.

The department may adopt emergency rules under this section without the finding otherwise required under section 28-32-02.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 282, § 21; 2001, ch. 423, § 2; 2007, ch. 115, § 14; 2019, ch. 405, § 3, effective August 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 14 of chapter 115, S.L. 2007 became effective May 1, 2007, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 23 of chapter 115, S.L. 2007.

50-11-03.
Department to make rules — Records kept by facility.

A record of all children and adults cared for in any facility licensed under this chapter must be maintained at the facility in the manner and form prescribed by the department. The department shall establish reasonable minimum standards, and shall make such reasonable rules for the conduct of such place as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 161, § 6; 1925 Supp., § 5099b6; R.C. 1943, § 50-1103; S.L. 1969, ch. 419, § 3; 1993, ch. 472, § 8.

50-11-03.1.
Reduction of number of children in foster care — Goals. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

On or before October 1, 1982, and annually thereafter, the department of human services shall attempt to reduce the number of children receiving assistance under title IV-E of the Social Security Act, who have been in foster care for more than twenty-four months, by the following amounts:

For the year beginning October 1, 1982, one percent of the number of children, in foster care for more than twenty-four months, and receiving benefits under title IV-A of the Social Security Act from July 1, 1979, through June 30, 1980;

For the years beginning October 1, 1983, and ending September 30, 1990, one percent of the maximum number permitted in the previous year; and

For all subsequent years, one-half percent of the maximum number permitted in the previous year.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 490, § 1.

50-11-03.1.
Reduction of number of children in foster care — Goals. [Effective September 1, 2022]

On or before October 1, 1982, and annually thereafter, the department of health and human services shall attempt to reduce the number of children receiving assistance under title IV-E of the Social Security Act, who have been in foster care for more than twenty-four months, by the following amounts:

For the year beginning October 1, 1982, one percent of the number of children, in foster care for more than twenty-four months, and receiving benefits under title IV-A of the Social Security Act from July 1, 1979, through June 30, 1980;

For the years beginning October 1, 1983, and ending September 30, 1990, one percent of the maximum number permitted in the previous year; and

For all subsequent years, one-half percent of the maximum number permitted in the previous year.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 490, § 1; 2021, ch. 352, § 420, effective September 1, 2022.

50-11-03.2.
Use of public funds.

Public funds for the purchase of foster care for children or adults may be used only in facilities licensed or approved by the department. No person acting on behalf of any state, county, or local governmental entity may arrange for or promote care provided in a facility that does not have a license or approval issued by the department. This section does not apply to any home or institution under the management and control of the state. Nonfederal funds may be used to reimburse the costs of shelter care placements for no more than seven days if the shelter care services are certified by the department. If the entity has diligently pursued other placement, the department may grant an extension for the health and safety of the child or due to unforeseeable circumstances.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 472, § 9; 2011, ch. 357, § 2; 2021, ch. 355, § 4, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2011 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 357, S.L. 2011 became effective August 1, 2011.

50-11-03.3.
Department to provide liability coverage to foster homes for children.

The department shall provide liability coverage for acts or omissions of foster children placed in the care of foster families. The department may provide this liability coverage through self-insurance.

The liability coverage under this section:

Must provide coverage for damage to property which is caused by the act of a foster child. This coverage must be for the lesser of the reasonable cost to repair or to replace the damaged property.

Is secondary to any other coverage.

Except as provided in subdivision d, may not exceed five thousand dollars per claim, with an annual maximum of ten thousand dollars per year per claimant. The coverage under this subsection must include a deductible not to exceed one hundred dollars per claim.

In cases in which the property damage per event total exceeds twenty-five thousand dollars, the department may further review the claim. The department may cover twenty-five percent of the remaining property damage after any insurance reimbursement, not to exceed ten thousand dollars.

The department may provide for exclusions from liability coverage provided under this section.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 419, § 1; 2017, ch. 224, § 4, effective August 1, 2017.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 130, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

50-11-03.4.
Immunity for a person providing foster care.

A person providing foster care for children in a licensed or approved facility is immune from civil liability for any act or omission resulting in damage or injury to or by a child in foster care if, at the time of the act or omission, the person providing foster care for children applied the reasonable and prudent parent standard in a manner that protects child safety, while also allowing the child in foster care to experience age or developmentally appropriate activities.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 338, § 2, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2015.

50-11-03.5.
Automated clearinghouse payments.

The department shall provide payment to family foster home for children, supervised independent living program, and qualified residential treatment program for children providers using an automated clearinghouse to provide for electronic fund transfers. To receive payment, family foster home for children, supervised independent living program, and qualified residential treatment program for children providers and applicants shall provide sufficient documentation to enable the department to provide electronic funds transfers through an automated clearinghouse. No other forms of payment are permitted, unless approved by the department.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 355, § 5, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 6 of chapter 355, S.L. 2021, provides: “

APPLICATION.

The department of human services shall stagger implementation of section 5 of this Act so it applies:

On January 1, 2022, to foster home for children, supervised independent living program, and qualified residential treatment program for children providers first certified on or after January 1, 2022; and

On January 1, 2023, to foster home for children, supervised independent living program, and qualified residential treatment program for children providers in existence on December 31, 2021.”

50-11-04.
Inspection by the department — Inspection and report by the department or its authorized agent.

The department and its authorized agents at any time may inspect any facility licensed under the provisions of this chapter or with respect to which a license application has been made. The department and its authorized agents shall have full and free access to every part of the facility. The department may require, on a case-by-case basis, prior to or after licensure, that a facility undergo a fire inspection, inspection of the heating system or the electrical system, or any other type of inspection that the department deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. All records of the facility must be open for the inspection of the department or its authorized agents and they may see and interview all children and adults cared for therein. Upon the request of the department, the department or its authorized agent shall inspect any facility for which a license is applied or issued, and shall report the results of the inspection to the department.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 161, § 6; 1925 Supp., § 5099b6; R.C. 1943, § 50-1104; S.L. 1969, ch. 419, § 4; 1993, ch. 472, § 10; 1993, ch. 479, § 3; 2005, ch. 418, § 3.

Cross-References.

Interstate Compact on Placement of Children, see § 14-13-05.

50-11-04.1.
Notice.

After each inspection or reinspection, the department shall mail or deliver any correction order or notice of noncompliance to the facility.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 472, § 11.

50-11-04.2.
Correction order — Contents.

Whenever the department determines that the facility is not in compliance with this chapter, or the rules adopted thereunder, a notice of license denial or revocation or a correction order must be issued to the facility. A correction order must cite the statute or rule violated, state the factual basis of the violation, specify the time allowed for correction, and specify the amount of any fiscal sanction to be assessed if the correction order is not complied with in a timely fashion. A correction order may also state a suggested method of correction or require the submission of a corrective action plan by the facility. If a correction order requires the submission of a corrective action plan, it must also specify a date by which the corrective action plan must be submitted. The department shall, by rule, establish a schedule of allowable times for correction of deficiencies.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 472, § 12.

50-11-04.3.
Reinspections.

A facility issued a correction order under section 50-11-04.2 must be inspected at the end of the period allowed for correction. If, upon inspection, it is determined that the facility has not corrected a violation identified in the correction order, a notice of noncompliance with the correction order must be mailed or sent to the facility. The notice must specify the uncorrected violations and the penalties assessed in accordance with section 50-11-04.5.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 472, § 13.

50-11-04.4.
Fiscal sanctions.

A facility, if issued a notice of noncompliance with a correction order, must be assessed fiscal sanctions in accordance with a schedule of fiscal sanctions established by rule. The fiscal sanction must be assessed for each day the facility remains out of compliance after the allowable time for the correction of deficiencies ends and must continue until a notice of correction is received by the department in accordance with section 50-11-04.6. No fiscal sanction for a specific violation may exceed twenty-five dollars per day of noncompliance.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 472, § 14.

50-11-04.5.
Accumulation of fiscal sanctions.

A facility must promptly provide written notice to the department when a violation noted in a notice of noncompliance is corrected. Upon receipt of written notice by the department, the daily fiscal sanction assessed for the deficiency must stop accruing. The facility must be promptly reinspected. If, upon reinspection, it is determined that the deficiency has not been corrected, the daily assessment of fiscal sanctions must resume and the amount of fiscal sanctions that otherwise would have accrued during the period prior to resumption must be added to the total assessment due from the facility. The department must mail or deliver a notice of resumption to the facility. Recovery of the resumed fiscal sanction must be stayed if the licensee makes a written request for an administrative hearing in the manner provided for in chapter 28-32, provided that the written request for the hearing is made to the department within ten days after mailing or delivery of the notice of resumption.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 472, § 15.

50-11-04.6.
Recovery of fiscal sanctions — Hearing.

Fiscal sanctions assessed pursuant to this chapter are payable fifteen days after receipt of the notice of noncompliance and at fifteen-day intervals thereafter, as the fiscal sanctions accrue. Recovery of an assessed fiscal sanction must be stayed if the operator makes written request to the department for an administrative hearing within ten days after mailing or delivery of the notice.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 472, § 16.

50-11-04.7.
Disposition of fiscal sanctions.

Any fiscal sanction collected for any violation of this chapter or of rules adopted pursuant to this chapter must be paid into the state treasury for the general fund after the costs of recovering the fiscal sanction are deducted therefrom.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 472, § 17.

50-11-05.
Contents of records not disclosed — Exception.

The records of facilities licensed under this chapter and the records of the department and its authorized agents, pertaining to the children or adults receiving care, are confidential but may be disclosed:

In a judicial proceeding;

To officers of the law or other legally constituted boards or agencies; or

To persons who have a definite interest in the well-being of the adults or children concerned, who are in a position to serve their interests, and who need to know the contents of the records in order to assure their well-being and interests.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 161, § 7; 1925 Supp., § 5099b7; R.C. 1943, § 50-1105; S.L. 1969, ch. 419, § 5; 1993, ch. 472, § 18; 2011, ch. 359, § 1.

Effective Date.

The 2011 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 359, S.L. 2011 became effective August 1, 2011.

50-11-06.
Facility not to hold itself out as having authority to dispose of child by adoption unless licensed.

No facility licensed under this chapter may be held out as having authority to dispose of any child, advertise children for adoption, or be held out directly or indirectly, as being able to dispose of children, without first being licensed so to do under chapter 50-12.

Source:

S.L. 1915, ch. 183, § 12; 1923, ch. 161, § 8; 1925 Supp., § 5099b8; R.C. 1943, § 50-1106; S.L. 1969, ch. 419, § 6; 1993, ch. 472, § 19.

50-11-06.1.
Foster family care home for adults defined. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 472, § 25.

Note.

For present definitions, see section 50-11-00.1.

50-11-06.2.
Department to establish standards — Licensing — Inspection — Prosecute violations. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 472, § 25.

Note.

As to transitional living services, see subsection 23 of section 50-06-05.1.

50-11-06.3.
License required — Term — Revocation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 472, § 25.

Note.

For license requirement for furnishing foster care for adults, see section 50-11-01.4.

50-11-06.4.
Contents of license. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 472, § 25.

50-11-06.5.
Records kept by home. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 472, § 25.

Note.

As to standards, rules and records for facilities licensed under this chapter, see section 50-11-03.

50-11-06.6.
Department to furnish information when requested.

Whenever requested by any person, organization, corporation, or limited liability company interested in establishing a foster care facility for children or adults, the department shall furnish information concerning the minimum requirements for a facility and concerning the need for a facility in any given community.

Any person, organization, corporation, or limited liability company is entitled, upon request, to be advised by the department or its authorized agent regarding the policy, procedure, and intentions of the department or its authorized agent toward placement of children in that person’s, organization’s, corporation’s, or limited liability company’s facility if:

The person, organization, corporation, or limited liability company is licensed to provide foster care for children under this chapter and has not received a placement for twelve months or more; or

The person, organization, corporation, or limited liability company is applying for its license to provide foster care for children under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 419, § 12; 1985, ch. 528, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1993, ch. 472, § 20; 2005, ch. 418, § 4.

50-11-06.7.
License approval or denial — Time requirements.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, an application to the department for a license required by this chapter to provide foster care to adults or children must be approved or denied within sixty days of its receipt by the department. The department has an additional forty-five days to grant or deny a license required by this chapter if the department notifies the applicant that the additional time is necessary.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 529, § 1; 1993, ch. 472, § 21.